Utah statutes.
76-8-415.   Damaging or removing monuments of official surveys.
Every person who willfully injures, defaces, or removes any signal, monument,
building, or appurtenance thereto, placed, erected, or used by persons engaged
in the United States or state survey is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
